District of Columbia statutes.
16-1359

Inspection of property by jury; presence of parties.

After being selected, impaneled, and sworn, as provided by sections 16-1357 and 16-1358 , and before hearing the evidence, the jury, in order to inspect the property to be acquired, shall be taken upon the property by the United States marshal at a time fixed by the court. All parties in interest, their attorneys, and representatives have the right to be present at the inspection.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 579, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
This section is referenced in § 16-1360.
1981 Ed., § 16-1359.
1973 Ed., § 16-1359.